Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5362.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that:(a) The continuity and sustainability of victim services programs are essential to public safety;(b) Federal victims of crime act funding is the most significant resource for crime victim services in Washington state, funding programs in every county and for every type of harm;(c) The fluctuations of federal funding levels strain the infrastructure needed to equitably resource victim services; and(d) The consequences of unstable and insufficient funding has immediate impacts on the lives and safety of crime victims, families, and communities.(2) Washington state commits to providing for the continuity of victim services programs to ensure trauma-informed, culturally relevant, accessible, and high-quality services for victims of crime.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 7.68 RCW to read as follows:(1) The victims of crime act account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.(2) Beginning in fiscal year 2026, the state treasurer must transfer into the victims of crime act account from the general fund the following sums, less the amount received by the state pursuant to the federal victims of crime act of 1984, 34 U.S.C. Sec. 20101 et seq., and as thereafter amended, in the previous fiscal year, as determined by the office of financial management:(a) $50,000,000 per fiscal year for fiscal years 2026, 2027, 2028, and 2029;(b) $60,000,000 per fiscal year for fiscal years 2030, 2031, 2032, and 2033; and(c) $70,000,000 per fiscal year for each fiscal year thereafter.(3) Expenditures from the account may be used for programs providing services for victims of crime throughout the state. Expenditures from the account:(a) Must be administered in a unified process with federal victims of crime act funds and the victims of crime act state plan, with separate reporting as necessary to comply with federal and state regulations;(b) Shall be used to supplement, but not supplant, funding that programs providing services for victims of crime receive from other sources;(c) May be used as a match for federal victims of crime act funds; and(d) May not be used for capital projects.(4) Not more than five percent of the funds deposited in the victims of crime act account under this section may be available for the administrative costs of the office of crime victims advocacy in supporting programs providing services for victims of crime throughout the state.(5) The office of crime victims advocacy shall submit a report to the legislature with data on crime victim services and recommendations for future aggregate funding levels for the victims of crime act account every five years, with a preliminary report due December 15, 2039.--- END ---